Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 48

Personal Representatives

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

28-48-101. Persons entitled to domiciliary letters.

Domiciliary letters testamentary or of general administration may be granted to one (1) or more of the natural or corporate persons mentioned in this section who are not disqualified, in the following order of priority:

To the executor or executors nominated in the will;

To the surviving spouse, or his or her nominee, upon petition filed during a period of thirty (30) days after the death of the decedent;

A person is not qualified to serve as domiciliary personal representative if the person is:

Under eighteen (18) years of age;

Of unsound mind;

A convicted and unpardoned felon, either under the laws of the United States or of any state or territory of the United States;

A corporation not authorized to act as fiduciary in this state;

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 70; 1975, No. 620, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2201; Acts 2015, No. 844, § 1.

28-48-102. Letters — Issuance — Form.

“In the Circuit Court of
County, Arkansas. In the Matter of the Estate of C.D., deceased. No.
Letters of Administration (Testamentary) Be it known that A.B., whose address is
, having been duly appointed administrator of the estate (executor of the will) of C.D., deceased, who died on or about
, 20 , and having qualified as such administrator (executor) is hereby authorized to act as such administrator (executor) for and in behalf of the estate and to take possession of the property thereof as authorized by law. Issued this
day of
, 20 . , Clerk.
(Seal)”.

Click to view form.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 71; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2202; Acts 2007, No. 438, § 1; 2013, No. 1137, § 1.

28-48-103. Special administrators.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 79; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2210.

28-48-104. Joint personal representatives.

Unless otherwise provided by will, the powers given to two (2) personal representatives may be exercised only by their joint action, and powers given to more than two (2) personal representatives may be exercised only by the joint action of a majority of them.

Every power exercisable by joint personal representatives may be exercised by the survivor of them when one is dead or by the other when one (1) appointment is terminated by order of the court unless the power is given in the will and its terms otherwise clearly provide as to the exercise of the power.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, §§ 75, 76; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2206, 62-2207.

28-48-105. Removal generally.

(1)When the personal representative becomes mentally incompetent, disqualified, unsuitable, or incapable of discharging his or her trust, has mismanaged the estate, has failed to perform any duty imposed by law or by any lawful order of the court, or has ceased to be a resident of the state without filing the authorization of an agent to accept service as provided by §28-48-101(b)(6), then the court may remove him or her.

The court on its own motion may, or on the petition of an interested person shall, order the personal representative to appear and show cause why he or she should not be removed.

The removal of a personal representative after letters have been duly issued to him or her does not invalidate his or her official acts performed prior to removal.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 72; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2203.

28-48-106. Death or incompetency — Protection of estate.

The death of a personal representative or the appointment of a guardian for the estate of a personal representative terminates his or her appointment.

Until appointment and qualification of a successor or special representative to replace the deceased or incompetent representative, the representative of the estate of the deceased or incompetent personal representative, if any, has the duty to protect the estate possessed and being administered by his or her decedent or ward at the time his or her appointment terminates, has the power to perform acts necessary for protection, and shall account for and deliver the estate assets to a successor or special personal representative upon his or her appointment and qualification.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 620, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2203.1.

28-48-107. Successor personal representatives.

When a personal representative dies, is removed by the court, or resigns and the resignation is accepted by the court, the court may, and, if he or she was the sole or last surviving personal representative and the administration is not completed, the court shall, appoint another personal representative in his or her place upon the motion or petition of an interested person.

When a personal representative in succession or an administrator with the will annexed is appointed, he or she shall have all the rights and powers of his or her predecessor or of the executor nominated in the will, except that he or she shall not exercise powers given in the will which by its terms are clearly personal to the executor therein nominated.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, §§ 73, 74; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2204, 62-2205.

28-48-108. Compensation of personal representative — Employment of attorneys, etc.

The personal representative shall be allowed such compensation for his or her services, when and as earned, as the court shall deem just and reasonable. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this compensation is not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the first one thousand dollars ($1,000), five percent (5%) of the next four thousand dollars ($4,000), and three percent (3%) of the balance of the value of the personal property passing through the hands of the personal representative, provided that compensation shall be allowed only on the value of such property as shall have been fully administered.

(1)When the personal representative has performed substantial duties with respect to or on account of real property of the decedent, the court, in addition to other compensation provided by the Probate Code, may allow a reasonable compensation for such services with the amount thereof to be fixed by the court, taking into consideration the nature and extent of the services, the extent and value of the real property, and other relevant circumstances.

The burden of the payment of the additional compensation shall be borne in accordance with applicable provisions of the will, if any. Otherwise, the burden of the payment shall be borne by the distributees or beneficiaries of the estate whom the court finds to have been benefited by the services, in accordance with the principles of equity.

The court, in the exercise of its discretion, may decline to allow any compensation to or on behalf of a personal representative who has failed, after being cited to do so, to file a satisfactory account or to perform any other substantial duty pertaining to his or her office, and, for the same reason, the court may reduce the compensation which would otherwise be allowed to or on behalf of such a personal representative.

(1)The personal representative may employ legal counsel in connection with the probate of the will or the administration of the estate, and the attorney so employed shall prepare and present to the circuit court all necessary notices, petitions, orders, appraisals, bills of sale, deeds, leases, contracts, agreements, inventories, financial accounts, reports, and all other proper and necessary legal instruments during the entire six (6) months, or longer when necessary, while the estate is required by law to remain open.

For the legal services described in subdivision (d)(1) of this section, the attorney, unless otherwise contracted with the personal representative, heirs, and beneficiaries of the estate, shall be allowed a fee based on the total market value of the real and personal property reportable in the circuit court, as follows:

Five percent (5%) of the first five thousand dollars ($5,000);

Four percent (4%) of the next twenty thousand dollars ($20,000);

Three percent (3%) of the next seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000);

Two and three-fourths percent (2¾%) of the next three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000);

Two and one-half percent (2½%) of the next six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000); and

Two percent (2%) of the value of all properties thereafter.

If the schedule of fees as provided in subdivision (d)(2) of this section is determined by the court to be either excessive or insufficient under the circumstances, then the court shall allow the attorney a fee commensurate with the value of the legal services rendered.

When authorized by the will or the court, the personal representative may employ accountants, engineers, appraisers, and other persons whose services are reasonably required in connection with the administration of the estate, and the court shall fix or approve the compensation for such services, which shall be allowed as an item of expense of the administration.

(1)Upon election, a personal representative may fix his or her or its own fee and the fees of the attorneys for the estate or any accountant, auditor, or investment advisor without prior approval from the court, but the reasonableness of the compensation of any person so employed or the compensation for the services of the personal representative, either on petition of any interested person, on petition by the personal representative, or on the court's own motion, shall be reviewed by the court.

Any person who has received excessive compensation from the estate for services rendered may be ordered to make appropriate refunds.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 77; 1957, No. 297, § 2; 1967, No. 287, § 5; 1975, No. 620, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2208.

28-48-109. Allowances for defending will or prosecuting its probate.

When any person nominated in a will as executor or the administrator with the will annexed, in good faith defends the will or prosecutes any proceedings for the purpose of having it admitted to probate, whether successful or not, he or she shall be allowed out of the estate his or her necessary expenses and disbursements including reasonable attorney's fees in such proceedings.

If the nominated executor or administrator with the will annexed should fail to defend the will or prosecute proceedings for its probate and one (1) or more interested parties take such action and are successful, then the parties shall be reimbursed out of the estate for their necessary expenses and disbursements including reasonable attorney's fees.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 78; 1967, No. 287, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2209.

Subchapter 2

— Bond

28-48-201. Bond required.

Prior to the issuance of letters and except as provided in §28-48-206, the court or the clerk, subject to approval or rejection by the court, shall take a bond from the personal representative with two (2) or more sufficient sureties who are residents of this state, or a corporate surety authorized to do business in this state, for the benefit of the interested parties. The bond shall be in an amount fixed by the court not less than double the amount or, if the surety is corporate, then not less than the amount, of the estimated value of the property which may reasonably be expected to pass through the hands of the personal representative.

When two (2) or more persons are appointed personal representatives of the same estate and are required by the provisions of the Probate Code to give a bond, the court may require either a separate bond from each or one (1) bond from all of them.

No personal representative shall be deemed a surety for another personal representative unless the terms of the bond so provide.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, §§ 80, 84; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2211, 62-2215.

28-48-202. Failure to give bond or file acceptance.

If at any time a personal representative fails to give a bond as required by the court or, if no bond is required, fails to file written acceptance of his or her appointment within the time fixed by the court, some other person shall be appointed in his or her stead. If letters have been issued, they shall be revoked.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 87; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2218.

28-48-203. Sureties.

Unless authorized by special order of the court, no sheriff, clerk of any court, the deputy of either, the judge of any court, or attorney at law shall be taken as surety on the bond of a personal representative.

A surety upon the bond of a personal representative desiring to be released from subsequent liability shall serve upon the personal representative a notice that, on and after a date fixed in the notice, which date shall be not less than twenty (20) days from the date of service, the surety will withdraw as surety upon the bond. A copy of the notice of withdrawal shall be filed in the court immediately.

On and after 12 noon of the termination date fixed in the notice, the surety shall be released from liability on the bond for subsequent acts or defaults of the personal representative, and, unless before noon of the termination date a new bond with sufficient surety shall be filed and approved, the personal representative shall ipso facto be removed, and a successor shall be appointed.

However, the surety shall not be released from liability until the personal representative shall have furnished a new bond with surety approved by the court, or until his or her successor has been appointed, has qualified, and has taken over the assets of the estate, or until a final settlement of his or her principal has been approved.

The original sureties shall be liable for all breaches of the obligation of the bond up to the time of filing of the new bond and approval of the bond by the court, but they shall not be liable for acts and omissions of the personal representative thereafter.

The new bond shall bind the sureties thereon with respect to acts and omissions of the personal representative from the time when the sureties on the original bond are no longer liable therefor or from such prior time as the court directs.

An additional or second administration bond entered into by order of the probate court on the death of a security in the first bond, whether upon or without the complaint of an interested party, relieved the securities in the first bond from all liability occurring after execution of the second bond. State v. Stroop, 22 Ark. (9 Barber) 328 (1860) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, §§ 85, 89; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2216, 62-2220.

28-48-204. Form.

With appropriate variations in the case of an executor, administrator with will annexed, or other special case, the bond of the personal representative shall be in substantially the following form:

In the Circuit Court of
County, Arkansas. Bond of Personal Representative The undersigned
as principal, having been appointed administrator of the estate (executor of the will) of
, deceased, and
as sureties, acknowledge themselves to be jointly and severally obligated to the State of Arkansas, for the use and benefit of all persons interested in said estate in the penal sum of
DOLLARS ($ ) conditioned as follows: If the undersigned administrator (executor) shall well and faithfully account for his administration of said estate, as by law required, this bond shall become null and void, otherwise to remain in full force and effect. Dated this
day of
, 20
as principal.
as surety.
as surety. Approved this
day of
, 20

Click to view form.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 83; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2214.

Cross References. Bonds not void for want of form, §16-68-204.

28-48-205. Approval of bond required.

No bond of a personal representative shall be deemed sufficient unless it shall have been examined and approved by the court, or by the clerk, subject to confirmation by the court, and the approval is endorsed thereon.

Before giving approval of a bond executed by personal sureties, the court or clerk shall require affidavits from the sureties that they collectively own property in this state subject to execution of a value over and above their liabilities and equal to the amount of the bond.

In the event the bond is not approved, the personal representative, within such time as the court or the clerk may direct, shall secure a bond with satisfactory surety or sureties.

Ark. L. Rev.

Probate Code Amendments, 5 Ark. L. Rev. 377.

A probate court had no authority, on application of a guardian, to substitute new bonds and sureties for old bonds and sureties theretofore approved and accepted by it, for reasons which were not provided by statute. White v. New Amsterdam Cas. Co., 195 Ark. 249, 111 S.W.2d 477 (1937) (decision under prior law).

Where guardian and sureties were before the probate court and an order permitting substitution of surety, approving new bond, and releasing the sureties on the original bond was made by the court of its own motion, but not entered on the record, an order nunc pro tunc, directing that it be shown on the judgment record, was proper; but the order did not discharge former sureties from liability that might have accrued prior to the order. Williams v. Goodwin, 200 Ark. 897, 141 S.W.2d 515 (1940) (decision under prior law).

Ark. L. Rev.

Probate Code Amendments, 5 Ark. L. Rev. 377.

A probate court had no authority, on the application of a guardian, to substitute new bonds and sureties for old bonds and sureties theretofore approved and accepted by it, for reasons which were not provided by statute. White v. New Amsterdam Cas. Co., 195 Ark. 249, 111 S.W.2d 477 (1937) (decision under prior law).

Where the guardian and sureties were before the probate court and an order permitting substitution of surety, approving new bond, and releasing the sureties on the original bond was made by the court of its own motion, but not entered on the record, an order nunc pro tunc, directing that it be shown on the judgment record, was proper; but the order did not discharge the former sureties from liability that might have accrued prior to the order. Williams v. Goodwin, 200 Ark. 897, 141 S.W.2d 515 (1940) (decision under prior law).

An order requiring a personal representative to secure a bond was proper and did not constitute a deprivation of due process where (1) the appellees complied with subsection (c)(2) by filing their written demand (i.e., their administrative claim) and petitioning the probate court for an order directing the estate's assets be returned or, alternatively, requiring the personal representative to secure a bond, (2) the petition was served upon the personal representative, and (3) the probate court held a hearing on the petition and granted the relief sought in the petition. Eddins v. Style Optics, Inc., 71 Ark. App. 102, 35 S.W.3d 315 (2000).

An administrator in succession was not charged with the illegal acts of his predecessor to the extent that he, if he accepted the trust when appointed and when he made bond, had to take such trust coupled with the mandatory duty to determine the legality or illegality of his predecessor's conduct and act accordingly. Meyer v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 197 Ark. 418, 122 S.W.2d 586 (1938) (decision under prior law).

The bond of the personal representative shall not be void upon the first recovery but may be proceeded upon from time to time until the whole penalty is exhausted.

The statute of limitations did not begin to run in favor of a surety on a deceased guardian's bond until there was a final settlement of the guardian's accounts in the probate court and an order to pay over the balance due the ward. State ex rel. Davis v. Buck, 63 Ark. 218, 37 S.W. 881 (1896); Rhea v. Bagley, 66 Ark. 93, 49 S.W. 492 (1899) (decisions under prior law).

Upon termination of the guardianship relation and an adjustment of the accounts and establishment of the amount due from the guardian, the cause of action accrued at once, if there was some person capable of suing; if there was no such person, then the cause of action was postponed until there was someone capable of suing. Wallace v. Swepston, 74 Ark. 520, 86 S.W. 398 (1905) (decision under prior law).

Where a guardian secured a new bond, but there was no discharge of old bond, both sets of bondsmen could have been liable. Beakley v. Cunningham, 112 Ark. 71, 165 S.W. 259 (1914) (decision under prior law).

An order of a probate court ascertaining amount of funds in hands of administrator and directing him to pay the funds into court for benefit of heirs, without naming them, was not an order of distribution sufficient to authorize heirs to sue on administrator's bond to recover funds for their own use. Ferguson v. Carr, 85 Ark. 246, 107 S.W. 1177 (1908) (decision under prior law).

A suit could not be brought on a bond until there was an order of the probate court to pay over. Connelly v. Weatherford, 33 Ark. 658 (1878); Vance v. Beattie, 35 Ark. 93 (1879); State ex rel. Davis v. Buck, 63 Ark. 218, 37 S.W. 881 (1896); Beakley v. Cunningham, 112 Ark. 71, 165 S.W. 259 (1914) (decisions under prior law).

The settlement by the probate court of a deceased guardian's account was sufficient to support an action against his surety for the amount found due, though no order of payment was made. Smith v. Smithson, 48 Ark. 261, 3 S.W. 49 (1887) (decision under prior law).

The rule that a cause of action against a surety on a guardian's bond did not accrue until the amount of the liability was established by an order of the probate court and an order was made by such court directing the amount to be paid over was limited, so far as the prerequisite of an order to pay over was concerned, to settlements which were not final and where the guardianship was left continuing. Wallace v. Swepston, 74 Ark. 520, 86 S.W. 398 (1905) (decision under prior law).

An action on a bond was not maintainable until the probate court had adjusted the accounts of the administrator and ordered him to pay over the amount found to be in his hands. Planters' Mut. Ins. Ass'n v. Harris, 96 Ark. 222, 131 S.W. 949 (1910) (decision under prior law).

Statute for reviving judgment against administrators held not to apply to probate judgments. Rose v. Thompson, 36 Ark. 254, 1880 Ark. LEXIS 90 (1880), overruled in part, Price v. Price, 253 Ark. 1124, 491 S.W.2d 793 (1973) (decision under prior law).

A distributee of an estate was not entitled to bring an action against the administrator for waste or conversion of the assets without showing that the claims of creditors had been satisfied; however, if judgment was obtained, the amount recovered should have been paid to the administrator in succession, to be distributed under direction of the probate court. Brice v. Taylor, 51 Ark. 75, 9 S.W. 854 (1888) (decision under prior law).

The failure of administrator to comply with an order of distribution was such a breach of his bond as justified action by a distributee. Ferguson v. Carr, 85 Ark. 246, 107 S.W. 1177 (1908) (decision under prior law).

Sureties upon a deceased guardian's bond who had been forced to make good his default would be subrogated to the remedy of the ward against the guardian's homestead. State ex rel. Luck v. Atkins, 53 Ark. 303, 13 S.W. 1097 (1890) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 86; 1951, No. 255, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2217.

28-48-206. Increase or reduction in amount — Dispensing with bond.

The court may at any time increase or decrease the amount of the bond required of a personal representative when good cause appears.

At its discretion and subject to subsequent revocation, the court may dispense with the requirement of a bond when, by the terms of the will, the testator directed or requested that no bond be required of the personal representative.

(1)Except with respect to a nonresident administrator, the court, at its discretion and subject to subsequent revocation, may reduce the amount of bond which would otherwise be required or dispense with the requirement of a bond:

If the personal representative is a bank or a trust company whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or a trust company chartered and regulated by an appropriate state authority; or

When all distributees are competent and have filed their written waiver of the requirement of bond, and the petition shall recite that there are no known unsecured claims.

However, if any person asserting a claim against the estate or having or claiming any interest in the estate files a written demand, the personal representative shall give bond as required in §28-48-201 or in such other amount as the court shall direct after considering the amount of the alleged claim or asserted interest, but, if it is shown to the court that the alleged claim is invalid or has been paid or that the person alleging the interest in the estate has, in fact, no interest therein, then bond shall not be required.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, §§ 81, 88; 1951, No. 54, § 1; 1951, No. 255, § 6; 1961, No. 17, § 1; 1967, No. 287, § 7; 1975, No. 620, § 10; 1979, No. 384, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 62-2212, 62-2219; Acts 1999, No. 635, § 1.

28-48-207. Obligations.

The bond of the personal representative shall run to the State of Arkansas for the use of all persons interested in the estate and shall be for the security and benefit of such persons.

The sureties shall be jointly and severally liable with the personal representative and with each other.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 83; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2214.

28-48-208. Enforcement of obligations.

The execution of the bond of a personal representative shall be deemed an appearance by the surety in the proceeding for the administration of the estate, but he or she shall be entitled to receive notices of all hearings with respect to his or her liability under the bond.

(1)Subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of this section, upon breach of the obligation of the bond of the personal representative and after notice to the obligors on the bond and to such other persons as the court may direct, the court may summarily as a part of the proceeding for the administration of the estate determine the damages, enter judgment therefor against the obligors on the bond, and by appropriate process enforce the collection thereof.

The determination and enforcement may be made by the court upon its own motion or upon application of a successor personal representative, or of any other interested person.

The court may hear the application at the time of settling the accounts of the defaulting personal representative or at such other time as the court may direct.

Damages shall be assessed in behalf of all interested persons and may be paid over to the successor or other nondefaulting personal representative and distributed as other assets held by the personal representative in his or her official capacity.

The same remedies shall be available against a defaulting personal representative irrespective of whether there is a bond.

If the estate is already distributed, or if for any reason the procedure to recover on the bond provided in subsection (b) of this section is inadequate, or at his or her election, an interested person may bring a separate suit in a court of competent jurisdiction in his or her own behalf for damages suffered by him or her by reason of the default of the personal representative.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 90; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2221.

28-48-209. Agreement to deposit assets.

It shall be lawful for the personal representative to agree with his or her surety for the deposit of any or all moneys and other assets of the estate with a bank, safe deposit, or trust company authorized by law to do business as such, or other depository approved by the court if the deposit is otherwise proper, in such manner as to prevent the withdrawal of the moneys or other assets without the written consent of the surety or on order of the court made on such notice to the surety as the court may direct. However, the agreement shall not alter the liability of the personal representative or surety as fixed by the bond.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 82; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2213.

Subchapter 3

— Public Administrators

28-48-301. Sheriff.

By virtue of his or her office, the sheriff shall be public administrator in his or her county.

It shall be the duty of the public administrator to take custody of all property of every kind in the county belonging to a deceased person if:

The person dies or is found dead in the county without known spouse or next of kin and no qualified person petitions the court for grant of administration;

The person, though dying elsewhere, leaves any property in the county which is exposed to loss or damage or is not in the custody of some responsible person; or

For any other reason, the circuit court shall direct him or her to take custody of property.

A sheriff could act as public administrator by virtue of his office without appointment by the probate court. Elmore v. Bishop, 184 Ark. 243, 42 S.W.2d 399 (1931) (decision under prior law).

Until the sheriff assumed the duty of administering or was directed by the court to do so, he did not become the administrator of a particular estate and could not be required to allow or reject a claim against it. Williamson v. Furbush, 31 Ark. 539 (1876) (decision under prior law).

The general power to act as public administrator could be assumed by the sheriff taking the property into possession, if necessary, to prevent waste or he could do so upon the order of the probate court. Elmore v. Bishop, 184 Ark. 243, 42 S.W.2d 399 (1931) (decision under prior law).

A public administrator could, in the first instance, act on his own judgment, but the probate court had jurisdiction to determine all questions arising in the progress of the administration. Elmore v. Bishop, 184 Ark. 243, 42 S.W.2d 399 (1931) (decision under prior law).

A public administrator had no more or greater power, authority, or rights than other administrators. State v. Rottaken, 34 Ark. 144 (1879) (decision under prior law).

Where there was no administration upon an estate, and the sheriff refused to administer, and the creditor was a nonresident and could not administer, they afforded no grounds for chancery to assume jurisdiction to administer the estate. The probate court had exclusive original jurisdiction, and the sheriff could be compelled to administer. Flash, Lewis & Co. v. Gresham, 36 Ark. 529 (1880) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 174; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3001.

28-48-302. Inventory and administration.

The public administrator shall make an inventory of all property of a decedent taken into his or her custody and administer and account for it according to the provisions of the Probate Code for the administration of estates of decedents.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 175; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3002.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

28-48-303. Bond.

The sheriff and the sureties on his or her official bond shall be responsible for each estate for which he or she acts as public administrator for the faithful performance of his or her duties as such. However, the court in the exercise of its discretion may require him or her to file a bond as is provided in the Probate Code to be filed by a general personal representative, and the liability of the sureties on the special bond, if any, shall be exhausted before resort to the official bond.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 176; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3003.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

28-48-304. Accounting to regular personal representative.

Upon the appointment of a general personal representative in an estate for which the public administrator is acting, the administrator shall account for and deliver to the general personal representative all of the property of the estate in his or her hands.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 177; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3004.

28-48-305. Expiration of sheriff's term.

If, at the expiration of his or her term of office, a sheriff is acting as public administrator of any estate, he or she shall conclude the administration of the estate within six (6) months of the expiration of his or her term if possible. Otherwise, he or she shall file his or her account and deliver to his or her successor in office the property of the estate in his or her hands.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 178; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3005.